Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-707
Powers; conferred on certain cities.

The powers vested in cities and villages under sections 19-701 to 19-707 shall be conferred upon cities of the primary class, cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and villages, whether or not such city or village is operating under a home rule charter adopted pursuant to Article XI of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1919, c. 188, § 7, p. 427;

C.S.1922, § 4606;

C.S.1929, § 19-707;

Laws 1941, c. 26, § 7, p. 127;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 19-714;

R.S.1943, § 19-707;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 63.